Hawaii statutes.
[§257-5] Death. In the event of an
account holder's death, the account may be transferred to the ownership of a
contingent beneficiary. An account holder shall name contingent beneficiaries
at the time the account is established and may change beneficiaries at any
time. If the named beneficiary is deceased or otherwise cannot accept the
transfer, the moneys shall be transferred to the individual development account
match fund of the fiduciary organization. [L 1999, c 160, pt of §25]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next